Hawaii statutes.
§651-14 Appointment of receiver. The
court before which the action is pending, or the judge thereof, may at any time
appoint a receiver whose pay shall be taken out of the fees of the police
officer to take possession of property attached under this chapter, and to
collect the revenues thereof, manage, and control the same, and pay over the
proceeds according to the nature of the property and the exigency of the case.
[L 1905, c 84, §14; RL 1925, §2818; RL 1935, §4203; RL 1945, §10154; RL 1955,
§233-14; HRS §651-14]

Rules of Court

See HRCP rule 66.

Case Notes

Compensation for services of receivers, rests in discretion
of court. 8 H. 740 (1892).

Under court authorization, receiver can complete a
construction project begun by a corporation before insolvency and the costs
will be chargeable to the property specifically benefited. 57 H. 321, 555 P.2d
864 (1976).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next